Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2504
Collaborating veterinarian agreement; required; when; contents.

Possession and administration of a euthanizing drug by an animal welfare organization shall be pursuant to a collaborating veterinarian agreement. A collaborating veterinarian agreement is between a veterinarian and an animal welfare organization and includes:

(1) Designation of the responsible individual or individuals for the animal welfare organization;

(2) Provisions for the proper storage and inventory of the euthanizing drugs;

(3) Maintenance of effective controls against the diversion of such drugs;

(4) Provisions for proper training of any animal welfare organization staff whose duties include administering a euthanizing drug. Such training includes information in at least the following areas: The pharmacology, proper administration, and storage of euthanizing drugs; federal and state laws regulating the storage and inventory of euthanizing drugs; stress management; and proper disposal of euthanized animals; and

(5) Maintenance of a valid veterinary-client-patient relationship.

Pursuant to a collaborating veterinarian agreement, a veterinarian shall maintain a separate registration under section 28-408 at the principal place of business of the animal welfare organization.

Laws 1999, LB 573, § 4.